Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators § 1 et seq.

33 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators § 1 et seq.

§ 2-3-101.
Oath.

Before letters testamentary or of administration are issued, the personal representative shall take and subscribe an oath before some officer authorized to administer oaths, that he will perform according to law the duties of executor or administrator, which oath shall be attached to the letters.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4660; C.S. 1910, § 5527; C.S. 1920, § 6800; R.S. 1931, § 88-2201; C.S. 1945, § 6-1001; W.S. 1957, § 2-121; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-501; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

As to oath of special administrators, see §

2-7-304

.

Cited

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-102.
Bond required; sureties; form; amount; ascertaining value of property.

Except as provided by W.S.

2-3-111

, every person to whom letters testamentary or of administration are issued shall, before receiving them, execute a bond to the state of Wyoming with two (2) or more sufficient individual sureties or one (1) sufficient corporate surety approved by the district court or the commissioner or clerk. The bond shall be joint and several and the penalty shall not be less than the value of the personal property, and the probable value of the annual rents, profits and issues of real property belonging to the estate. The value shall be ascertained by the district court or the above named officers by examining on oath the party applying and any other person. The sureties shall justify on written oath attached to the bond in an amount equal in the aggregate to the penalty thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 2; 1897, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4661; C.S. 1910, § 5528; C.S. 1920, § 6801; Laws 1927, ch. 22, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-2202; C.S. 1945, § 6-1003; W.S. 1957, § 2-122; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-502; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For authority of clerk of district court to approve bonds, see §

2-2-203

.

As to when bonds not required if will so expresses, see §

2-3-111

.

As to bond when executor sole legatee under will, and as to requirements under bond, see §

2-11-301

.

As to justification of sureties, see §

1-1-104

.

As to qualifications of sureties, see §

1-1-105

.

As to limitation of action on official bond or undertaking of an officer, assignee, trustee, executor, administrator or guardian, or upon a bond or undertaking given in pursuance of a statute, see §

1-3-108

.

Liability for claim against testator as surety for officer. —

See Snyder v. State, 5 Wyo. 318, 40 P. 441,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1895) (misapplication by officer after testator's death).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When statute of limitations begins to run against action on bond of personal representative, 44 ALR2d 807.

What funds, not part of the estate, are received under color of office so as to render liable surety on executor's or administrator's bond, 82 ALR3d 869.

§ 2-3-103.
Letters and bonds to be recorded.

All letters testamentary or of administration issued to, and all bonds executed by personal representatives, with the affidavits and certificates thereon, shall be recorded by the clerk of the court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4662; C.S. 1910, § 5529; C.S. 1920, § 6802; R.S. 1931, § 88-2203; C.S. 1945, § 6-1002; W.S. 1957, § 2-123; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-503; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-104.
Appointment orders to state qualification time; lapses.

Whenever an order appointing a personal representative is made by any district court or officer having authority to make the appointment, the order shall state the time within which the personal representative shall qualify by giving the bond and taking the oath required by law. Upon failure of any personal representative to qualify within the time fixed, his appointment shall lapse and another appointment shall be made.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 33, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5531; C.S. 1920, § 6804; R.S. 1931, § 88-2205; C.S. 1945, § 6-1005; W.S. 1957, § 2-124; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-504; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to when letters of administration may be granted, see §

2-4-208

.

§ 2-3-105.
Additional bond required upon sale of real estate; when required.

The district court may require an additional bond whenever the sale of any real estate belonging to the estate is ordered, unless it satisfactorily appears that the penalty of the bond given before receiving letters or any bond given in place thereof is equal to the value of the personal property remaining with or that will come into the possession of the personal representative, including the annual rents, profits and issues of real estate, and the probable amount to be realized on the sale of real estate ordered sold.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4663; C.S. 1910, § 5530; C.S. 1920, § 6803; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 125; R.S. 1931, § 88-2204; C.S. 1945, § 6-1004; W.S. 1957, § 2-125; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-505; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability of contractual right, in which fiduciary has interest, to purchase property of estate or trust, 6 ALR4th 786.

§ 2-3-106.
Additional bond required upon sale of real estate; conditions.

The additional bond shall be conditioned that the personal representative shall faithfully execute the duties of the trust according to law, and the sureties shall justify as provided in W.S.

2-3-102

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4664; C.S. 1910, § 5532; C.S. 1920, § 6805; R.S. 1931, § 88-2206; C.S. 1945, § 6-1006; W.S. 1957, § 2-126; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-506; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

When liability of administrator becomes fixed, that of surety also attaches;

and upon failure of principal to pay money an action can be maintained against surety. In such case decree of probate court is conclusive upon status of account as respects sureties as well as administrator. Wayman v. Alanko, 351 P.2d 100,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 2-3-107.
Separate bond required from each personal representative.

When two (2) or more persons are appointed personal representatives, a separate bond is required from each of them in the same amount as would be required from one.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4665; C.S. 1910, § 5533; C.S. 1920, § 6806; R.S. 1931, § 88-2207; C.S. 1945, § 6-1007; W.S. 1957, § 2-127; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-507; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Failure of executors to file separate bonds is not sufficient ground for removal

of the executors where the clerk accepts a joint and several bond signed by a surety company. In re Estate of Hartt, 75 Wyo. 305, 295 P.2d 985,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1956).

§ 2-3-108.
Several recoveries on same bond allowed.

The bond shall not be void upon the first recovery. It may be used and recovered upon from time to time by any person aggrieved, in his own name, until the whole penalty is exhausted.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 466; C.S. 1910, § 5534; C.S. 1920, § 6807; R.S. 1931, § 88-2208; C.S. 1945, § 6-1008; W.S. 1957, § 2-128; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-508; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-109.
Ordering sureties to appear for property value examination; notice to personal representatives; requiring additional security.

Before any bond is approved and after its approval, the officer whose duty it is to approve the same, of his own motion or upon the motion of any person interested in the estate, supported by affidavit that the sureties or one (1) or more of them are not worth as much as they have justified to, may order the sureties to appear before him at a designated time and place to be examined touching their property and its value. The officer shall, at the same time, cause a notice to be issued to the personal representative requiring his appearance at the examination. If, upon examination of the sureties and the witnesses who appear, the officer is satisfied that the bond is insufficient, he shall require additional security.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4667; C.S. 1910, § 5535; C.S. 1920, § 6808; R.S. 1931, § 88-2209; C.S. 1945, § 6-1009; W.S. 1957, § 2-129; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-509; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-110.
When sufficient security not given in time.

If sufficient security is not given within the time fixed by the order, the right of the personal representative to the administration shall cease, and the person next entitled to the administration of the estate, shall be appointed to the administration upon execution of a sufficient bond.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4668; C.S. 1910, § 5536; C.S. 1920, § 6809; R.S. 1931, § 88-2210; C.S. 1945, § 6-1010; W.S. 1957, § 2-130; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-510; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-111.
When no bond required; generally.

When it is expressly provided in the will or by statute that no bond be required of the personal representative or when the distributees waive in writing the requirement that a bond be executed, letters testamentary or of administration may issue without the execution and filing of a bond as provided by W.S.

2-3-102

.

When a bond is waived by will, by statute or by the distributees, sales of real estate may be made and confirmed without a bond unless the court for good cause requires one to be executed.

If it appears necessary for any reason at any time afterward, the personal representative may be required to file a bond as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4669; C.S. 1910, § 5537; C.S. 1920, § 6810; R.S. 1931, § 88-2211; C.S. 1945, § 6-1011; W.S. 1957, § 2-131; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-511; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For requirements as to bond generally, see §

2-3-102

.

As to waiver of bonding requirement where bank named as executor, administrator or trustee of estate, see § 13-2-101(a)(x).

Section not limited by additional bond provisions. —

The fact that a petition may, under §

2-3-113

, be filed to request additional bond does not limit the provisions of this section. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-112.
When no bond required; suspension of powers upon allegation of waste.

When a petition is presented praying that a personal representative be required to give further security, or to give bond, where by the terms of the will no bond was originally required, and it is alleged on oath that the personal representative is wasting the property of the estate, the judge or commissioner may by order suspend his powers until the matter can be heard and determined.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 4674; C.S. 1910, § 5542; C.S. 1920, § 6815; R.S. 1931, § 88-2216; C.S. 1945, § 6-1016; W.S. 1957, § 2-132; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-512; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to suspension of powers of executor generally upon information of waste or fraud, see §§

2-3-127

to

2-3-131

.

§ 2-3-113.
Requiring further security; petition.

Any person interested in any estate may, by verified petition, represent to the court or commissioner that the sureties of a personal representative have become or are becoming insolvent, or that they have removed or are about to remove from the state, or that from any other cause the bond is insufficient, and ask that further security be required.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 4670; C.S. 1910, § 5538; C.S. 1920, § 6811; R.S. 1931, § 88-2212; C.S. 1945, § 6-1012; W.S. 1957, § 2-133; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-513; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Court not restricted to information in petition. —

The legislature clearly intended that the court have authority to require a bond if it appears for any cause that it is necessary or proper, and this intent does not exclude information which has come to the court in a manner other than by a petition of an interested person. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

§ 2-3-114.
Requiring further security; citation to personal representative; service.

If the court or commissioner is satisfied that the matter requires investigation, a citation shall be issued to the personal representative requiring him to appear at a time and place specified to show cause why he should not give further security. The citation shall be served personally on the personal representative at least five (5) days before the return day. If he has absconded or cannot be found it may be served by leaving a copy of it at his place of residence or by such publication as may be ordered.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4671; C.S. 1910, § 5539; C.S. 1920, § 6812; R.S. 1931, § 88-2213; C.S. 1945, § 6-1013; W.S. 1957, § 2-134; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-514; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-115.
Requiring further security; hearing; order therefor or new bond.

At the time appointed the court shall hear the proofs and allegations of the parties. If it satisfactorily appears that the security is insufficient, an order may be made requiring the personal representative to give further security, or to file a new bond in the usual form within a reasonable time, not less than five (5) days.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4672; C.S. 1910, § 5540; C.S. 1920, § 6813; R.S. 1931, § 88-2214; C.S. 1945, § 6-1014; W.S. 1957, § 2-135; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-515; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-116.
Requiring further security; failure to comply.

If the personal representative neglects to comply with the order within the time prescribed, the court shall revoke his letters and his authority shall cease.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 4673; C.S. 1910, § 5541; C.S. 1920, § 6814; R.S. 1931, § 88-2215; C.S. 1945, § 6-1015; W.S. 1957, § 2-136; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-516; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-117.
Ordering further security without application.

When it comes to his knowledge that the bond of a personal representative is insufficient, the court or commissioner, without any application, shall cause him to be cited to appear and show cause why he should not give further security, and shall proceed as upon the application of any person interested.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 4675; C.S. 1910, § 5543; C.S. 1920, § 6816; R.S. 1931, § 88-2217; C.S. 1945, § 6-1017; W.S. 1957, § 2-137; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-517; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Court not restricted to information in petition. —

The legislature clearly intended that the court have authority to require a bond if it appears for any cause that it is necessary or proper, and this intent does not exclude information which has come to the court in a manner other than by a petition of an interested person. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Nor to initial bond. —

Authorization of the court to require that filing of an additional bond on its own motion should not be limited to the initial bond but should apply during the entire period of administration. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-118.
Relief of sureties; application; citation and service.

When a surety of any personal representative desires to be released from responsibility on account of future acts, he may apply to the court or commissioner for relief. Citation shall be issued to the personal representative and served personally, requiring him to appear at a time and place specified, and to give other security. If he has absconded, left or removed from the state or if he cannot be found after due diligence and inquiry, service may be made as provided in W.S.

2-3-114

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 16; R.S. 1899, § 4676; C.S. 1910, § 5544; C.S. 1920, § 6817; R.S. 1931, § 88-2218; C.S. 1945, § 6-1018; W.S. 1957, § 2-138; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-518; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-119.
Relief of sureties; release order.

If new sureties are given to the satisfaction of the court or commissioner, he may order that the sureties who applied for relief shall not be liable on their bond for any subsequent act, default or misconduct of the personal representative.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 4677; C.S. 1910, § 5545; C.S. 1920, § 6818; R.S. 1931, § 88-2219; C.S. 1945, § 6-1019; W.S. 1957, § 2-139; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-519; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-120.
Relief of sureties; revocation of letters.

If the personal representative neglects or refuses to give new sureties to the satisfaction of the court or commissioner, unless the surety making the application shall consent to a longer extension of time, the court or commissioner shall by order revoke his letters.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 8, § 18; R.S. 1899, § 4678; C.S. 1910, § 5546; C.S. 1920, § 6819; R.S. 1931, § 88-2220; C.S. 1945, § 6-1020; W.S. 1957, § 2-140; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-520; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-121.
Revoking intestacy administration if will later allowed; generally.

If, after granting letters of administration on the ground of intestacy, a will of the decedent is duly proved and allowed, the letters of administration shall be revoked and the power of the administrator shall cease, and he shall render an account of his administration within the time directed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4614; C.S. 1910, § 5474; C.S. 1920, § 6747; R.S. 1931, § 88-1001; C.S. 1945, § 6-1201; W.S. 1957, § 2-195; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1001; Laws § 88-1001; C.S. 1945, § 6-1201; W.S. 1957, § 2-195; 1977, § 2-5-1001; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to amercement of officers for neglect or failure to perform duty or failure to pay over moneys, etc., see §§

1-24-101

to

1-24-107

.

As to defaulting fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-136

to

2-3-138

.

Cited

in

Replogle v. Coolidge, 47 Wyo. 488, 41 P.2d 503,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1935).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-122.
Revoking intestacy administration if will later allowed; authority of personal representative.

In such case, the personal representative with the will annexed is entitled to demand, sue for, recover and collect all the rights, goods, chattels, debts and effects of the decedent remaining unadministered. He may prosecute to final judgment any suit commenced by the administrator before the revocation of his letters of administration.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4615; C.S. 1910, § 5475; C.S. 1920, § 6748; R.S. 1931, § 88-1002; C.S. 1945, § 6-1202; W.S. 1957, § 2-196; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1002; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-123.
Remaining personal representatives to continue if one disqualified.

If any one (1) of several personal representatives to whom letters are granted dies, becomes incompetent, is convicted of an infamous crime or otherwise becomes incapable of executing the trust, or if letters testamentary or of administration are revoked or annulled with respect to any one (1) personal representative, the remaining personal representative shall complete the execution of the will or administration.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4616; C.S. 1910, § 5476; C.S. 1920, § 6749; R.S. 1931, § 88-1101; C.S. 1945, § 6-1203; W.S. 1957, § 2-197; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1003; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-124.
New appointment to be made if all personal representatives die; bond; authority.

If all personal representatives die or become incapable, or the authority of all of them is revoked, letters testamentary or letters of administration then shall be issued in the same order of preference and manner as provided for the issuance of original letters testamentary or original letters of administration. The personal representative so appointed shall give bond in like penalty, with like sureties and conditions as required of personal representatives, and shall have like authority.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4617; C.S. 1910, § 5477; C.S. 1920, § 6750; R.S. 1931, § 88-1102; C.S. 1945, § 6-1204; W.S. 1957, § 2-198; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1004; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-125.
Resignation of personal representative; revocation of letters for delay or other cause and new appointment; liability after discharge.

Any personal representative may, by writing filed in the district court, resign his appointment at any time, having first settled his accounts and delivered up all the estate to the person appointed to receive the same. If by reason of any delays in such settlement and delivery of the estate or for any other cause the circumstances of the estate or the rights of those interested therein require it, the court may, before settlement of accounts and delivering up of the estate is completed, revoke the letters of the personal representative, and appoint another personal representative, either special or general, in the same manner as for original letters of administration. The personal representative discharged and released, and the sureties on his bonds are not responsible for any act or liability incurred after his discharge, but shall not be relieved of any liability occurring on his bonds prior to his discharge.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 4618; C.S. 1910, § 5478; C.S. 1920, § 6751; R.S. 1931, § 88-1103; C.S. 1945, § 6-1205; W.S. 1957, § 2-199; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1005; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Revocation of letters of administration was justified

where prior litigation between parties had created a hostile, adversarial atmosphere which threatened to interfere with orderly administration of estate. Gonzales v. Yaunick, 977 P.2d 1284,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Dividends as preventing lapse of policy for nonpayment of premiums, 8 ALR3d 862.

Resignation or removal of executor, administrator, guardian or trustee before final administration or before termination of trust, as affecting his compensation, 96 ALR3d 1102.

Delay of executor or administrator in filing inventory, account, or other report, or in completing administration and distribution of estate, as ground for removal, 33 ALR4th 708.

§ 2-3-126.
Acts valid until power revoked.

All acts of a personal representative before the revocation of his letters testamentary or of administration are as valid as if the personal representative had continued lawfully to execute the duties of his trust.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4619; C.S. 1910, § 5479; C.S. 1920, § 6752; R.S. 1931, § 88-1104; C.S. 1945, § 6-1206; W.S. 1957, § 2-200; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1006; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforceability of contractual right, in which fiduciary has interest, to purchase property of estate or trust, 6 ALR4th 786.

§ 2-3-127.
Suspension of personal representative's powers for waste; order.

Whenever the court, commissioner or clerk of court has reason to believe from his own knowledge or from credible information that any personal representative has wasted, embezzled or mismanaged, or is about to waste or embezzle the property of the estate committed to his charge, or has committed or is about to commit a fraud upon the estate, is incompetent to act, has permanently removed from the state, has wrongfully neglected the estate, or has long neglected to perform any act as personal representative, he shall by order suspend the powers of the personal representative until the matter is investigated.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4622; C.S. 1910, § 5482; C.S. 1920, § 6755; R.S. 1931, § 88-1301; C.S. 1945, § 6-1209; W.S. 1957, § 2-201; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1007; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to suspension of powers upon allegation of waste, see also §

2-3-112

.

Section is clear

that whenever a judge has reason to believe, from his own knowledge or from credible information, that the property has been removed from the estate or an estate has been wrongfully neglected, he may suspend the powers and thereupon issue citation to the executor to show why his letters should not be revoked. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Nonresident must permanently “remove” himself to be suspended. —

Where nonresident is appointed as executor, personally submits to jurisdiction of the court and personally conducts settlement of the estate, he cannot be removed from office on ground of his nonresidence unless he subsequently permanently “removes” from the state, in the sense of permanently absenting himself from place where business of his trust is transacted, or withdrawing himself beyond process of the court. Hecht v. Carey, 13 Wyo. 154, 78 P. 705,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1904).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” 8 Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of appeal from order on application for removal of personal representative, guardian or trustee, 37 ALR2d 751.

Requisites of notice and hearing in court proceedings for removal of personal representative, 47 ALR2d 307.

Compromise of claim due estate as ground of removal of executor or administrator, 72 A.L.R.2d 191.

Physical condition as affecting competency to serve as executor or administrator, 71 ALR3d 675.

§ 2-3-128.
Suspension of personal representative's powers for waste; notice to show cause.

When suspension is ordered, the personal representative shall be cited to appear and show cause why his letters should not be revoked. If he fails to appear or if upon appearance the court or officer is satisfied there exists cause for his removal, his letters shall be revoked and letters of administration granted anew as the case may require.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 4623; C.S. 1910, § 5483; C.S. 1920, § 6756; R.S. 1931, § 88-1302; C.S. 1945, § 6-1210; W.S. 1957, § 2-202; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1008; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

Hecht v. Carey, 13 Wyo. 154, 78 P. 705,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1904).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-129.
Suspension of personal representative's powers for waste; hearing and determination.

At the hearing any person interested in the estate or the officer making the charge may appear and file his allegations in writing, showing that the personal representative should be removed. The personal representative may answer. The issue raised shall be heard and determined by the court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4624; C.S. 1910, § 5484; C.S. 1920, § 6757; R.S. 1931, § 88-1303; C.S. 1945, § 6-1211; W.S. 1957, § 2-203; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1009; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Response by other beneficiaries not precluded. —

This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a will from demurring (now moving to dismiss) or answering to a petition by other beneficiaries of the will for removal of executor. In re Estate of Hartt, 75 Wyo. 305, 295 P.2d 985,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1956) (decided prior to promulgation of Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure). See §

2-2-308

.

§ 2-3-130.
Suspension of personal representative's powers for waste; notice by publication.

If the personal representative has absconded, conceals himself or has absented himself from the state, notice by publication may be given him of the pendency of the proceedings.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4625; C.S. 1910, § 5485; C.S. 1920, § 6758; R.S. 1931, § 88-1304; C.S. 1945, § 6-1212; W.S. 1957, § 2-204; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1010; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-131.
Suspension of personal representative's powers for waste; compelling attendance and answers.

In the proceedings for the removal of a personal representative, the court may compel his attendance by attachment, and may compel him to answer questions on oath touching his administration. Upon his refusal, the court may commit him until he obeys, revoke his letters, or both.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 4626; C.S. 1910, § 5486; C.S. 1920, § 6759; R.S. 1931, § 88-1305; C.S. 1945, § 6-1213; W.S. 1957, § 2-205; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1011; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-132.
Petition for revocation by prior claimant; generally.

When letters of administration are granted to any person other than the surviving husband or wife, child, father, mother, brother or sister of the intestate, any one (1) of them who is competent, or any competent person at the written request of any one (1) of them, may obtain the revocation of the letters and be entitled to administration by presenting to the court a petition so praying.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4653; C.S. 1910, § 5520; C.S. 1920, § 6793; R.S. 1931, § 88-2001; C.S. 1945, § 6-911; W.S. 1957, § 2-206; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1012; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and liabilities of married persons generally, see §§

20-1-201

,

20-1-202

.

Petition must be filed in reasonable time. —

It is essential that, for a petition of revocation to be favorably considered, it must have been made within a reasonable time. In re Estate of Johnson, 379 P.2d 824,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1963).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-3-133.
Petition for revocation by prior claimant; citation to personal representative.

When such petition is filed, the clerk shall issue a citation to the personal representative to appear and answer at the time appointed for the hearing.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 13; R.S. 1899, § 4654; C.S. 1910, § 5521; C.S. 1920, § 6794; R.S. 1931, § 88-2002; C.S. 1945, § 6-912; W.S. 1957, § 2-207; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1013; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requisites of notice and hearing in court proceedings for removal of personal representative, 47 ALR2d 307.

§ 2-3-134.
Petition for revocation by prior claimant; hearing and disposition.

At the time appointed, the citation having been duly served and returned, the court shall proceed to hear the allegations and proofs of the parties. If the right of the applicant is established and he is competent, letters of administration shall be granted to him and the letters of the former personal representative revoked.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 4655; C.S. 1910, § 5522; C.S. 1920, § 6795; R.S. 1931, § 88-2003; C.S. 1945, § 6-913; W.S. 1957, § 2-208; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1014; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Requisites of notice and hearing in court proceedings for removal of personal representative, 47 ALR2d 307.

§ 2-3-135.
Petition for revocation by prior claimant; prior right of surviving spouse.

When letters of administration have been granted to a child, father, brother or sister of the intestate, the surviving spouse may assert his or her prior right and obtain letters of administration and have the letters before granted revoked.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 7, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 4656; C.S. 1910, § 5523; C.S. 1920, § 6796; R.S. 1931, § 88-2004; C.S. 1945, § 6-914; W.S. 1957, § 2-209; W.S. 1977, § 2-5-1015; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-136.
Hearing upon affidavit of interested person; authority to order.

When it appears by the affidavit of any person interested in the estate that any personal representative, guardian, receiver, assignee or trustee has failed to render his accounts in the manner prescribed by law or as required by the order of the court, or has removed from the state, the court may order a hearing as hereinafter prescribed.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 73, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4558; Laws 1901, ch. 107, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5487; C.S. 1920, § 6760; R.S. 1931, § 88-1401; C.S. 1945, § 6-2201; W.S. 1957, § 4-33; W.S. 1977, §

4-7-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cited

in

Hibsman v. Mullen (In re Estate of Hibsman), 2012 WY 139,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Oct 31, 2012).

Cross references. —

As to examination of persons suspected of embezzling estate property, see §

2-7-412

.

As to examination of persons suspected of defrauding wards or concealing property, see §

3-1-104

.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-3-137.
Hearing upon affidavit of interested person; citation and service thereof.

The court shall make an order fixing the time and place of the hearing. The clerk shall issue citation to be served upon the officer charged as delinquent and upon the heirs, ward, cestui que trust or bondsmen. The citation shall be served by the sheriff upon the person or persons to be served, or by registered mail if personal service cannot be made in the county. The citation shall notify the persons served of the time and place of the hearing.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 73, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4559; Laws 1901, ch. 107, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 5488; C.S. 1920, § 6761; R.S. 1931, § 88-1402; C.S. 1945, § 6-2202; W.S. 1957, § 4-34; W.S. 1977, § 4-7-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-3-138.
Hearing upon affidavit of interested person; proceedings and disposition.

At the hearing the court shall proceed in a summary way to ascertain the facts and the course best calculated to protect the interests of all parties. Upon finding of default or removal from the state, the court may remove the personal representative, guardian, receiver, assignee or trustee and appoint another qualified person to administer the estate, who shall qualify according to law.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 73, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4560; C.S. 1910, § 5489; C.S. 1920, § 6762; R.S. 1931, § 88-1403; C.S. 1945, § 6-2203; W.S. 1957, § 4-35; W.S. 1977, § 4-7-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.